Utah statutes.
30-2-4.   Wife's right to wages -- Actions for personal injury.
A wife may receive the wages for her personal labor, maintain an action
therefor in her own name and hold the same in her own right, and may prosecute
and defend all actions for the preservation and protection of her rights and
property as if unmarried. There shall be no right of recovery by the husband
on account of personal injury or wrong to his wife, or for expenses connected
therewith, but the wife may recover against a third person for such injury or
wrong as if unmarried, and such recovery shall include expenses of medical
treatment and other expenses paid or assumed by the husband.
